Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,163
Annual waste reduction and recycling fee; amount; collection.

There is hereby imposed an annual waste reduction and recycling fee of twenty-five dollars on all businesses engaged in business in this state with retail sales of tangible personal property of fifty thousand dollars or more, which sales are subject to the tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. For all fee periods beginning on or after July 1, 1999, the twenty-five-dollar fee shall be paid for each business location of such business in this state if the retail sales of tangible personal property for the location are fifty thousand dollars or more. Subject to section 81-15,165, the fee shall be collected by the Department of Revenue and remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund.

Laws 1990, LB 163, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 21;

Laws 1999, LB 59, § 1.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.